Connecticut, session 2026, HB05017.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That section 12-704c of the general statutes be amended to double the
amount of (1) the maximum allowable credit against the personal
income tax for a person's primary residence or motor vehicle, and (2)
each qualifying Connecticut adjusted gross income threshold set forth
in said section.